Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 194.325 is amended to read:
194.325. (1) An applicant for a commission as a  notary public must pass an examination admin-
istered by the Secretary of State or an entity approved  by the secretary. The examination must be
based on the course of study described in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Before taking the examination required under subsection (1) of this  section, an applicant for
a commission as a notary public [ who does not hold  a commission in this state ] must complete a
course of study offered by the Secretary of State or an entity approved by the secretary.
(3) The Secretary of State or an entity approved by the secretary shall offer regularly  a course
of study to applicants [ who do not hold commissions as notaries  public in this state ] for a commis-
sion as a notary public . The course must cover the laws,  rules, procedures and ethics relevant to
notarial  acts.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 194.325 by section 1 of this 2024 Act apply to  ap-
plicants who take the notary public examination on or after the effective date  of this 2024
Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 20, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-INTRO) Page 2